Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2452
Business combination; prohibited activities.

Except as provided in section 21-2453, no issuing public corporation shall engage in any business combination with any interested shareholder of the issuing public corporation for a period of five years after the interested shareholder's share acquisition date unless the business combination or the acquisition of shares made by the interested shareholder on the interested shareholder's share acquisition date is approved by the board of directors of the issuing public corporation prior to the interested shareholder's share acquisition date.

Laws 1988, LB 1110, § 22.